Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1986.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXVI-MMASCOT TRANSITION GRANTSSection 2601-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"American Indian mascot." A name, symbol or image that depicts or refers to an American Indian or Native American tribe, individual, custom or tradition that is used as a public 1234567891011121314151617181920 institution of higher education's or a school entity's mascot, nickname, logo, letterhead or team name."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Eligible institution." A school entity or public institution of higher education which is approved by the department for a mascot grant under this article."Mascot grant." A monetary grant provided by the department under this article."Public institution of higher education." A university within the State System of Higher Education, a community college or State-related university."School entity." A school district, charter school, cyber charter school, private school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 2602-M. Mascot Grant Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Mascot Grant Fund is established within the State Treasury to provide mascot grants to an eligible institution.(b) Money.--The department shall make available $1,000,000 of the department's appropriation from the General Assembly in a fiscal year to be deposited into the Mascot Grant Fund for the implementation of this article.Section 2603-M. Grant eligibility and amount of award.Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the department shall allot a one-time mascot grant of up to $20,000 to an eligible institution which has an American Indian mascot as of the effective date of this section and voluntarily discontinues the use of the American Indian mascot on or after the effective date of this section.20250HB1986PN2505 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2604-M. Use of grant money.(a) Use.--A mascot grant shall be used for, or in connection with, expenses incurred by an eligible institution to offset the costs associated with the discontinued use of an American Indian mascot, including:(1) The purchase, design or renovation of new equipment such as logos, signs and other branding, including banners and letterhead, to remove the American Indian mascot.(2) The purchase or renovation of sports equipment, facilities, sport uniforms or other sports paraphernalia and branding at local sports facilities to remove the American Indian mascot.(3) The removal of American Indian mascots on an eligible institution's property, including artistic representations on flooring, windows, engravings or other adaptations on buildings.(b) Regulations.--The department may promulgate regulations governing the use of mascot grants.Section 2605-M. Forfeiture.An eligible institution which knowingly submits misrepresentations or false statements with the intention of fraudulently obtaining a mascot grant from the department shall be denied status as an eligible institution under this article.Section 2606-M. Application.To receive a mascot grant, an eligible institution must submit an application to the department that includes an estimated cost of discontinuing the use of an American Indian mascot. The department shall establish procedures and criteria for awarding mascot grants that shall include:(1) Other application requirements and the deadline for 20250HB1986PN2505 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 submission of a mascot grant application.(2) Criteria for prioritizing mascot grant applications which focuses on the necessity of each project described in the application and which has as the first priority an application that describes capital construction projects deemed necessary by the department for the eligible institution to discontinue use of the American Indian mascot.(3) Provisions for multiple school entities to apply jointly for funds to replace similar mascots or jointly procure replacement property of branded items.Section 2607-M. Research and assistance.The department may consult the Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission, Office of Advocacy and Reform or other Commonwealth agency for legal, administrative or cultural guidance to school entities applying for mascot grants.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1986PN2505 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516